Utah statutes.
65A-14-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Bioprospecting" means the removal from a natural environment for
research or commercial use of:
(i)  a naturally occurring microorganism, plant, or fungus; or
(ii)  information concerning a naturally occurring microorganism's, plant's,
or fungus' physical or genetic properties.
(b)  "Bioprospecting" does not include:
(i)  horticultural cultivation, except for horticultural genetic engineering
conducted in a manner otherwise constituting bioprospecting;
(ii)  an agricultural enterprise;
(iii)  a forest and range management practice;
(iv)  invasive weed management;
(v)  Christmas tree and related sales; or
(vi)  incidental removal of a microorganism, plant, or fungus while engaged in
bona fide research or commercial enterprises.
(2)  "Nonfederal public land" means land in the state that:
(a)  is not owned, controlled, or held in trust by the federal government; and
(b) (i)  is owned or controlled by:
(A)  the state;
(B)  a county, city, or town; or
(C)  a governmental entity other than the federal government; or
(ii)  is school and institutional trust lands, as defined in Section
53C-1-103.
